Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 4. Driver Training School Licenses

§ 701.
Definitions.

The following terms when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Commissioner” means the Vermont Commissioner of Motor Vehicles.

“Department” means the Vermont Department of Motor Vehicles.

“Driver training” means the instruction for hire in the driving of motor vehicles or in the preparation of an applicant for examination given by the Department for a driver’s license, but not including instruction given by employers to their employees.

“Driver training school” means any person engaged in providing driver training through one or more instructors, but not including a public or private school conducting a course in driver training approved by the Secretary of Education and the Commissioner.

“Established place of business” means a location approved by the Commissioner at which the business of a driver’s training school is transacted and at which its records are kept.

“Instructor” means any person engaged in giving driver training.

The terms “licensee” and “applicant” as applied to a firm, partnership, or association include the members thereof and as applied to a corporation include the officers and directors thereof.

“Person” means any individual, combination of individuals, firm, partnership, or corporation; whenever used in any provision of this subchapter which prescribes or imposes a fine or imprisonment, or both, the term “person,” as applied to a firm, partnership, or association, shall include the members thereof and, as applied to a corporation, the officers thereof; a firm, partnership, association, or corporation may be subjected as an entity to the payment of a fine.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 47

, § 19.

§ 702.
Training school and instructor’s licenses.

A person shall not operate a driver training school or act as an instructor unless the person has secured a license from the Commissioner. Applications for such licenses may be filed with the Commissioner and shall contain the information and shall be on the forms the Commissioner may prescribe. Each application for a driver’s training school license shall be accompanied by an application fee of $150.00, which shall not be refunded. If the application is approved by the Commissioner, the applicant upon payment of an additional fee of $225.00 shall be granted a license, which shall become void two years after the first day of the month of issue unless sooner revoked as provided in this subchapter. The renewal fee shall be $225.00. Each application for an instructor’s license shall be accompanied by an application fee of $105.00, which shall not be refunded. If the application is approved by the Commissioner, the applicant upon payment of an additional fee of $75.00 shall be granted a license, which shall become void two years after the first day of the month of issue unless sooner revoked as provided in this subchapter. The renewal fee shall be $75.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1989, No. 51

, § 41;

1997, No. 59

, § 75, eff. June 30, 1997;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 703.
Possession of license.

Each person granted a driver’s training school license shall display the same conspicuously on the school premises. Each person granted an instructor’s license shall carry the same in his or her possession while engaged in giving driver training. In case of loss, mutilation, or destruction of a license certificate, the Commissioner shall issue a duplicate certificate upon payment of a fee of $8.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1989, No. 51

, § 42;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 40.

§ 704.
Qualifications for training school license.

To qualify for a driver’s training school license, each new and renewal applicant shall:

not have been convicted of a felony nor incarcerated for a felony within the 10 years prior to the date of application;

maintain an established place of business open to the public;

maintain bodily injury and property damage liability insurance on each motor vehicle being used in driver training, insuring the liability of the driver training school and the operator of each motor vehicle for each instructor and of any person while using any such motor vehicle with the permission of the named insured in at least the following amount: $300,000.00 for bodily injury or death of one person in any one crash and, subject to said limit for one person, $500,000.00 for bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any one crash, and $100,000.00 for damage to property of others in any one crash;

have the equipment necessary to the giving of proper instruction in the operation of motor vehicles;

pay the application and license fees prescribed in section 702 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1981, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1983;

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 705.
Qualifications for instructor’s license.

In order to qualify for an instructor’s license, each applicant shall:

not have been convicted of:

a felony nor incarcerated for a felony within the 10 years prior to the date of application;

a violation of section 1201 of this title or a like offense in another jurisdiction reported to the Commissioner pursuant to subdivision 3905(a)(2) of this title within the three years prior to the date of application;

a subsequent violation of an offense listed in subdivision 2502(a)(5) of this title or of section 674 of this title; or

a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3;

pass such examination as the Commissioner shall require on:

traffic laws;

safe driving practices;

operation of motor vehicles; and

qualifications as a teacher;

be physically able to operate a motor vehicle and to train others in such operation;

have five years’ experience as a licensed operator and be at least 21 years of age on date of application;

pay the application and license fees prescribed in section 702 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 5, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 57

, § 17.

§ 706.
Powers of Commissioner.

The Commissioner may by rule prescribe requirements and standards for driver training, operation of driver training schools, and conduct of instructors.
The charges for such driver training shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 6, eff. Jan. 1, 1960.

§ 707.
Records required; maintenance of vehicles.

Every driver’s training school licensee shall keep a record on such forms as the Commissioner may prescribe showing the name and address of each instructor, the instruction license number of such instructor, the particular type of instruction given and how much time was given to each type of instruction, and such other information as the Commissioner may require. Such record shall be open to the inspection of the Department at all reasonable times. Individually identifying information about students that is exempt from public inspection and copying under

1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(7)

shall be kept confidential. Every driver’s training school licensee shall maintain all vehicles used in driver training in safe mechanical condition at all times.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

2015, No. 29

, § 13.

§ 708.
Refusal to issue license.

The Commissioner may refuse to issue a license to any applicant for a driver’s training school license or instructor’s license when he or she is satisfied that:

the applicant has not met the applicable requirements of sections 704 and 705 of this title;

the applicant has made a material false statement or concealed a material fact in connection with the application;

the applicant was previously the holder of a driver’s training school or instructor’s license that was revoked, suspended, or refused renewal;

the applicant has been convicted of a felony or any crime involving violence, dishonesty, or deceit;

the applicant is not the true owner of the driver training school.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 8, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 709.
Suspension and revocation.

The Commissioner may at any time cancel, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any driver’s training school or instructor’s license when he or she is satisfied that:

the licensee fails to meet the applicable requirements for a license under sections 704 and 705 of this title;

under the circumstances the Commissioner would have the right under the provisions of section 708 of this title to refuse to issue a license if the licensee were then making application therefor;

the licensee represents himself or herself as an agent or employee of the Department or uses advertising designed to lead persons, or that would reasonably have the effect of leading persons, to believe that such licensee is an employee or representative of the Department;

the licensee has willfully violated the provisions of section 705 of this title;

the licensee has failed to comply with the rules of the Commissioner made pursuant to this subchapter.

Notwithstanding the renewal of a license, the Commissioner may revoke or suspend such license for causes prescribed in this section although such causes occurred during license periods prior to the renewal.

HISTORY:

Added 1959, No, 153, § 9, eff. Jan. 1, 1960.

§ 710.
Hearing and appeal.

Each holder of a driver’s training school or instructor’s license under this section shall be entitled to notice and hearing prior to cancellation, suspension, revocation, or failure by the Department to renew the license of such licensee.
Hearings under the provisions of this section shall be held in accordance with the provisions of sections 105-107 of this title, and at such time and place as the Commissioner may determine.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 1960.

§ 711.
Penalties.

Any person who operates a driver training school or acts as an instructor without a license shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 153

, § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 1960; amended

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 158.